Washington statutes.
RCW 19.94.410

Butter, margarine to be sold by weight.

Butter, oleomargarine, and margarine offered for sale must be sold by weight.

[ 2019 c 96 s 13; 1995 c 355 s 19; 1988 c 63 s 1; 1969 c 67 s 41.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2019 c 96: See note following RCW 19.94.160.

Application—Effective dates—1995 c 355: See notes following RCW 19.94.015.